West Virginia, session 2026, HB5635.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 13NN.  Coalfield Housing Revitalization Tax Credit  Act. §11-13NN-1. Coalfield Housing Revitalization Tax Credit. (a) A state tax credit is established for rehabilitation of vacant or dilapidated residential properties in coalfield counties.  The amount of credit allowable is 50 percent of the amount of the taxpayer's eligible contribution.(b) Eligible properties may be used for workforce housing for educators, healthcare workers, first responders, and public employees.(c) Priority shall be given to projects supported by county commissions, housing authorities, or municipal redevelopment agencies.(d) For purposes of this section, the term "coalfield" means any county in the state of West Virginia that has:(1)  Historically had coal mining within its boundaries;(2)  Economically benefitted, or presently benefits, from the coal mining industry within its boundaries;(3) Historically had economic activity ancillary, or related, to the coal mining industry within its boundaries; or(4) Otherwise been, or will be, significantly affected by the coal mining industry.